Oklahoma, session 2026, SB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-1432.2, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 278, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1-1432.2), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-1432.2. As used in this act the Oklahoma Kratom


Consumer Protection Act:


1. “Food” means a food, food product, food ingredient, dietary


ingredient, dietary supplement or beverage for human consumption;


2. “Kratom leaf” means the leaf of the kratom plant, Mitragyna


speciosa, in fresh or dehydrated or dried form that undergoes no


post-harvest processing other than drying or size reduction by


cutting, milling, or similar procedure, and may be cleaned or

Req. No. 595 Page 1


sterilized using standard treatments applied to food ingredients,


such as heat, steam, pressurization, or irradiation or other


standard treatments applied to food ingredients. The total alkaloid


content of kratom leaf material used in the kratom product shall not


exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) measured on a dried weight-


to-weight basis;


3. “Kratom leaf extract” means the material obtained by


extracting kratom using a solvent consisting of:


a. water, ethanol, or food-grade carbon dioxide (CO ), or



b. any other solvent allowed by federal or state


regulation for use in manufacturing a food ingredient.


The extracted material shall contain mitragynine as the most


abundant alkaloid, measured on a weight-to-weight basis, and at a


level that is equal to or exceeds twice that of any other alkaloid


present. The ratio of mitragynine to other alkaloids in the extract


shall be equal to or greater than the ratio found in the starting


material;


4. “Kratom product” means a food or dietary supplement that


consists of or contains kratom leaf or kratom leaf extract that does


not contain any synthesized kratom alkaloids, other synthesized


kratom constituents, or synthesized metabolites of any kratom


constituent in which the level of 7-hydroxymitragynine, on a percent


weight basis, is not greater than one percent (1%) of the amount of


total kratom alkaloids, as confirmed with a high-performance liquid

Req. No. 595 Page 2


chromatography testing method. For purposes of this paragraph,


“synthesized” refers to substances produced using directed synthetic


or biosynthetic chemistry, as opposed to traditional food


preparation techniques such as heating or extracting;


5. “Total kratom alkaloids” means the sum of mitragynine,


speciociliatine, speciogynine, paynantheine, and 7-


hydroxymitragynine; and


6. “Vendor” means a person or entity that sells, prepares or


maintains kratom products or that advertises, represents or holds


himself, herself, or itself out as selling, preparing or maintaining


kratom products and includes a manufacturer, wholesaler, store,


restaurant, hotel, catering facility, camp, bakery, delicatessen,


supermarket, grocery store, convenience store, nursing home or food


or drink company.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-595 DC 12/30/2024 1:34:08 PM















Req. No. 595 Page 3